Alabama, session 2026rs, HB591.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. In addition to all other appropriations
heretofore or hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated a
total of up to $203,404,327 in federal funds from the One Big
Beautiful Bill Act of 2025 (P.L. 119-21) for the Rural Health
Transformation Program to the Alabama Department of Economic
and Community Affairs ("ADECA") for the fiscal year ending
September 30, 2026 for the following:
(1) To the Collaborative EHR, IT, and Cybersecurity
Initiative, up to $31,425,971.
(2) To the Rural Health Initiative, up to $55,936,190.
(3) To the Maternal and Fetal Health Initiative, up to
$6,102,130.
(4) To the Rural Workforce Initiative, up to
$57,919,382.
(5) To the Cancer Digital Regionalization Initiative,
up to $8,136,173.
(6) To the Simulation Training Initiative, up to
$1,017,021.
(7) To the Statewide EMS Trauma and Stroke Initiative,
Page 1

(7) To the Statewide EMS Trauma and Stroke Initiative,
HB591 Enrolled
up to $4,068,085.
(8) To the EMS Treat-In-Place Initiative, up to
$5,085,108.
(9) To the Mental Health Initiative, up to $7,271,705.
(10) To the Rural Health Practice Initiative, up to
$6,102,130.
(11) Up to $20,340,432 of funds may be used to
reimburse costs for the administration, auditing, and
reporting requirements of the Rural Health Transformation
Program funds.
Section 2. All funds appropriated herein and not
expended in the current fiscal year shall not revert but be
carried forward for the purpose appropriated.
Section 3. (a) Any amount of the funds appropriated in
this act remaining unexpended on September 30, 2026, shall be
reappropriated for the same purposes for the fiscal year
beginning October 1, 2026.
(b) In the event that any of the appropriations to any
of the initiatives listed above needs to be adjusted or
exceeded for the utilization of available funds, the Director
of ADECA shall obtain written concurrence of a majority of the
Finance Director, the Chair of the House Ways and Means
General Fund Committee, and the Chair of the Senate Finance
and Taxation General Fund Committee of the Legislature for
such reallocation prior to seeking the approval referenced in
Section (c) below.
(c) Following receipt of the above concurrence, the
Director of ADECA shall seek approval from the Centers for
Page 2

Director of ADECA shall seek approval from the Centers for
HB591 Enrolled
Medicare and Medicaid Services ("CMS") for the above
reallocation. In the event such approval is modified or
withheld by CMS, ADECA shall continue to administer the
appropriation in accordance with CMS requirements.
Section 4. Nothing in this act is intended nor shall be
construed to require any expenditure of federal funds in
violation of any federal law, regulation, rule, policy, or
procedure, or of any term or condition applicable to the
administration of federal funds by ADECA in connection with
the Rural Health Transformation Program, nor shall anything
herein be construed to prohibit the expenditure of federal
funds by ADECA in accordance with the purposes for which and
the terms and conditions upon which such funds were made
available.
Section 5. (a) There is hereby created a Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Rural Health Transformation
Program Funds, hereinafter referred to as the committee. The
committee shall consist of the Chair of the House Ways and
Means - General Fund Committee; the Chair of the Senate
Finance and Taxation – General Fund Committee; three members
of the House Ways and Means - General Fund Committee appointed
by the chair of the committee, including the ranking minority
member of the committee, or his or her designee; and three
members of the Senate Finance and Taxation - General Fund
Committee appointed by the chair of the committee, including
the ranking minority member of the committee, or his or her
designee; the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives;
the Minority Leader of the Senate; the Speaker of the House of
Page 3

the Minority Leader of the Senate; the Speaker of the House of
HB591 Enrolled
Representatives, or his or her other designee; the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, or his or her designee; a member of
the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker; and a
member of the Senate, appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate. The Chair of the House Ways and Means - General
Fund Committee and the Chair of the Senate Finance and
Taxation - General Fund Committee shall be co-chairs of the
oversight committee. The committee shall hold its
organizational meeting within 30 days following the effective
date of this act and shall meet at the call of the co-chairs
thereafter.
(b) The co-chairs of the oversight committee, on behalf
of the oversight committee, shall have authority to request
and receive reports, supplemental information, or data from
the Department of Economic and Community Affairs or the
100 administering entity related to the implementation of the
101 programs funded in this act and any other act appropriating
102 Rural Health Transformation Program Funds and to conduct
103 hearings and receive testimony therein related to the
104 implementation of the aforesaid programs.
105 Section 6. This act shall become effective immediately
106 upon its passage and approval by the Governor, or upon its
107 otherwise becoming law.
Page 4

otherwise becoming law.
HB591 Enrolled
108
109
110
111
112
113
114
115
116 ________________________________________________
117 Speaker of the House of Representatives
118
119
120
121 ________________________________________________
122 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
123
124
125 House of Representatives
126
127 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
128 was passed by the House 01-Apr-26.
129
130 John Treadwell
131 Clerk
132
133
134
135
136
137 Senate 08-Apr-26 Passed
138
139
140
Page 5